Alabama, session 2026rs, HB448.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
37 Section 1. The following amendment to the Constitution
38 of Alabama of 2022, is proposed:
39 PROPOSED AMENDMENT
40 Part 1. Section 65 of the Constitution of Alabama of
41 2022, is repealed and in lieu thereof the following language
42 shall be adopted as Section 65, Section 65.01, and Section
43 65.02 of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022:
44 Section 65
45 (a) Except as expressly provided in this constitution,
46 the Legislature shall have no power to authorize any form of
47 gambling activity for any purpose and shall pass laws to
48 prohibit any unlawful gambling activity and unlawful
49 gambling-related activity.
50 (b) This section, Section 65.01, and Section 65.02 of
51 the constitution shall be further implemented by act of the
52 Legislature enacted during the 2026 Regular Session. It is the
53 intent of the Legislature that any such legislative act be
54 read in pari materia with these constitutional provisions.
55 Section 65.01
56 (a) The Legislature, by general law, may provide for
Page 2

(a) The Legislature, by general law, may provide for
HB448 INTRODUCED
57 the establishment and regulation of an official State Lottery
58 as follows:
59 (1) The lottery may consist of draw-based and instant
60 win lottery games.
61 (2) The lottery may use only tickets made of cardboard,
62 paper, plastic, or some functionally similar material unless
63 otherwise required to participate in a multi-jurisdiction
64 lottery.
65 (3) The lottery may not use video lottery terminals.
66 (4) The lottery may participate in a multi-jurisdiction
67 lottery.
68 (b) The State Lottery shall be operated and regulated
69 on behalf of the state by a public corporation as an
70 instrumentality of the state. The Legislature may provide by
71 law for the establishment, operation, and governance of the
72 corporation, including appointments to the governing body of
73 the corporation by officers of the Legislature, in a manner
74 without regard to Article III of this Constitution.
75 (c) The Legislature may provide for some portion of the
76 proceeds from the lottery to be used to pay the operating
77 expenses of the lottery, including all prizes, without any
78 appropriation required by law. The Legislature shall use funds
79 within the Education Trust Fund to pay for the initial
80 start-up operating expenses of the state lottery and the
81 public corporation described in this section, provided the
82 public corporation shall pay back to the Education Trust Fund
83 the start-up expenses of the lottery and of the corporation
84 from the initial revenues of the lottery.
Page 3

from the initial revenues of the lottery.
HB448 INTRODUCED
85 (d) There is established in the State Treasury the
86 Alabama Lottery Trust Fund. Net proceeds generated from the
87 lottery shall be deposited at least annually into the fund and
88 shall be separately appropriated by the Legislature through an
89 annual independent supplemental appropriation bill.
90 Section 65.02
91 (a) The Governor shall negotiate and may execute a
92 Tribal-State gaming compact with the Poarch Band of Creek
93 Indians, as contemplated under the Indian Gaming Regulatory
94 Act, 25 U.S.C. § 2701 et seq., which shall authorize any and
95 all activities allowable under that act, including Class III
96 games in any form; provided, the Governor may only grant
97 authority for activity to be conducted in person and on lands
98 held in trust by the United States for the benefit of the
99 Poarch Band of Creek Indians prior to February 6, 2024.
100 (b) Following execution of the compact, the Governor
101 shall file the compact with the Secretary of State and the
102 commission. The Secretary of State shall forward an executed
103 copy of the compact to the Secretary of the Interior for
104 review and approval in accordance with, and to the extent
105 required by, federal law.
106 (c) The state's immunity to suit in federal court under
107 the Eleventh Amendment to the United States Constitution is
108 expressly waived for the sole purpose of resolving disputes
109 arising under the terms of any compact negotiated pursuant to
110 this section. The waiver of the state's immunity under this
111 section is contingent upon an equivalent submission in the
112 compact by the Poarch Band of Creek Indians to the
Page 4

compact by the Poarch Band of Creek Indians to the
HB448 INTRODUCED
113 jurisdiction of federal court.
114 (d) It is the intent of this section to only regulate
115 the terms of a Tribal-State gaming compact for activities
116 conducted on trust lands. Nothing in this section shall be
117 deemed to prohibit the Poarch Band of Creek Indians, or a
118 wholly owned subsidiary thereof, from conducting any
119 commercial activity off trust lands as a private commercial
120 actor, subject to this constitution and general law.
121 Upon ratification of this constitutional amendment, the
122 Code Commissioner shall number and place this amendment as
123 appropriate in the constitution omitting this instructional
124 paragraph and may make the following nonsubstantive revisions:
125 change capitalization, hierarchy, spelling, and punctuation
126 for purposes of style and uniformity; correct manifest
127 grammatical, clerical, and typographical errors; revise
128 internal or external citations and cross-references; harmonize
129 language; and translate effective dates.
130 END OF PROPOSED AMENDMENT
131 Section 2. An election upon the proposed amendment
132 shall be held in accordance with Sections 284 and 285 of the
133 Constitution of Alabama of 2022, and the election laws of this
134 state. The appropriate election official shall assign a ballot
135 number for the proposed constitutional amendment on the
136 election ballot and shall set forth the following description
137 of the substance or subject matter of the proposed
138 constitutional amendment:
139 "Proposing an amendment to the Constitution of Alabama
140 of 2022, to: (1) establish an official Alabama State Lottery;
Page 5

of 2022, to: (1) establish an official Alabama State Lottery;
HB448 INTRODUCED
141 (2) provide for the distribution of all lottery revenues; and
142 (3) require the Governor to negotiate a compact with the
143 Poarch Band of Creek Indians pursuant to the federal Indian
144 Gaming Regulatory Act.
145 Proposed by Act ____."
146 This description shall be followed by the following
147 language:
148 "Yes( ) No( )."
149 Section 3. The proposed amendment shall become valid as
150 a part of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, when approved
151 by a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon.
Page 6